Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 2. Agency Adoptions.

§ 63.2-1221.
Placement of children for adoption by agency or local board.

A licensed child-placing agency or local board may place for adoption, and is empowered to consent to the adoption of, any child who is properly committed or entrusted to its care, in accordance with the provisions of §§

63.2-900

,

63.2-903

,

63.2-1817

or this section, when the order of commitment or the entrustment agreement between the birth parent(s) and the agency or board provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child for the purpose of placing and consenting to the adoption of such child.

The entrustment agreement shall divest the birth parent(s) of all legal rights and obligations with respect to the child, and the child shall be free from all legal obligations of obedience and maintenance with respect to them, provided that such rights and obligations may be restored to the birth parent(s) and the child by circuit court order prior to the entry of a final order of adoption upon proof of fraud or duress. An entrustment agreement for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities shall be executed in writing and notarized, and shall be revocable prior to entry of an order finalizing the agreement (i) upon proof of fraud or duress, or (ii) after the placement of the child in an adoptive home upon written mutual consent of the birth parents and prospective adoptive parents.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.2; 1990, c. 202; 1991, c. 364; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.28; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 815; 2009, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to parental or agency consent for adoption, and exceptions to consent requirement, see §

63.2-1202

.

As to removal of child from adoptive home, see §

63.2-1207

.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 815 added the last sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805 added the language beginning “and shall be revocable” to the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 63.2-1222.
Execution of entrustment agreement by birth parent(s); exceptions; notice and objection to entrustment; copy required to be furnished; requirement for agencies outside the Commonwealth.

For the purposes of this section, a birth parent who is less than 18 years of age shall be deemed fully competent and shall have legal capacity to execute a valid entrustment agreement, including an agreement that provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities, and perform all acts related to adoption and shall be as fully bound thereby as if such birth parent had attained the age of 18 years.

An entrustment agreement for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child shall be valid notwithstanding that it is not signed by the birth father of a child born out of wedlock if the identity of the birth father is not reasonably ascertainable or such birth father did not register with the Virginia Birth Father Registry pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.) or the birth father named by the birth mother denies under oath and in writing the paternity of the child. An affidavit signed by the birth mother stating that the identity of the birth father is unknown may be filed with the court alleging that the identity of the birth father is not known or reasonably ascertainable. A birth father shall be given notice of the entrustment if he is an acknowledged father pursuant to §

20-49.1

, an adjudicated father pursuant to §

20-49.8

, a presumed father pursuant to §

63.2-1202

, or a putative father who has registered with the Virginia Birth Father Registry pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.). If the putative father’s identity is reasonably ascertainable, he shall be given notice pursuant to the requirements of §

63.2-1250

.

When a birth father is required to be given notice, he may be given notice of the entrustment by registered or certified mail to his last known address. If he fails to object to the entrustment within 15 days of the mailing of such notice, his entrustment shall not be required. An objection to an entrustment agreement shall be in writing, signed by the objecting party or counsel of record for the objecting party and filed with the agency that mailed the notice of entrustment within the time period specified in §

63.2-1223

.

The execution of an entrustment agreement shall be required of a presumed father except under the following circumstances: (i) if he denies paternity under oath and in writing in accordance with §

63.2-1202

; (ii) if the presumption is rebutted by sufficient evidence, satisfactory to the circuit court, which would establish by a preponderance of the evidence the paternity of another man or the impossibility or improbability of cohabitation of the birth mother and her husband for a period of at least 300 days preceding the birth of the child; (iii) if another man admits, in writing and under oath, that he is the biological father; or (iv) if an adoptive placement has been determined to be in the best interests of the child pursuant to §

63.2-1205

.

When none of the provisions of subsections C and D apply, notice of the entrustment shall be given to the presumed father pursuant to the requirements of § 16.1-277.01.

An entrustment agreement for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child shall be valid notwithstanding that it is not signed by the birth father of a child when the birth father has been convicted of a violation of subsection A of §

18.2-61

, §

18.2-63

, subsection B of §

18.2-366

, or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, and the child was conceived as a result of such violation.

A birth father may execute an entrustment agreement for the termination of all of his parental rights prior to the birth of the child. Such entrustment shall be subject to the revocation provisions of §

63.2-1223

.

No entrustment shall be required of a birth father if he denies under oath and in writing the paternity of the child. Such denial of paternity may be withdrawn no more than 10 days after it is executed. Once the child is 10 days old, any executed denial of paternity is final and constitutes a waiver of all rights with respect to the adoption of the child and cannot be withdrawn.

A copy of the entrustment agreement shall be furnished to all parties signing such agreement.

When any agency outside the Commonwealth, or its agent, that is licensed or otherwise duly authorized to place children for adoption by virtue of the laws under which it operates executes an entrustment agreement in the Commonwealth with a birth parent for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child, the requirements of §§

63.2-1221

through

63.2-1224

shall apply. The birth parent may expressly waive, under oath and in writing, the execution of the entrustment under the requirements of §§

63.2-1221

through

63.2-1224

in favor of the execution of an entrustment or relinquishment under the laws of another state if the birth parent is represented by independent legal counsel. Such written waiver shall expressly state that the birth parent has received independent legal counsel advising of the laws of Virginia and of the other state and that Virginia law is expressly being waived. The waiver also shall include the name, address, and telephone number of such legal counsel. Any entrustment agreement that fails to comply with such requirements shall be void.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.2; 1990, c. 202; 1991, c. 364; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.29; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 815; 2005, c. 890; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2009, c. 805; 2012, c. 424; 2017, c. 200.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 815 substituted “18” for “eighteen” in two places in the first paragraph, sustituted “21” for “twenty-one” in the second paragraph, and added the last paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 890 inserted “or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction” in the third paragraph; and made a related change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are nearly the same, and rewrote the section. Acts 2006, c. 825, also inserted a reference to the Putative Father Registry in subsection B. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825 is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “or” for “and” preceding “such birth” in the first sentence, “entrustment” for “proceedings,” “or a putative father who” for “a putative father that” and deleted “or a putative father that has not registered with Putative Father Registry but whose identity is reasonably ascertainable” in the second sentence and added the third sentence; deleted “subsection D of” preceding “§

63.2-1202

” in clause (i) of subsection D; substituted “subsections C and D” for “subsection D” in subsection E; and deleted “not married to the mother of the child” following “A birth father” in subsection G.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805 inserted the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 424 deleted “of this chapter” following “(§

63.2-1249

et seq.)” twice in subsection B; and substituted “An objection to an entrustment agreement shall be in writing, signed by the objecting party or counsel of record for the objecting party and filed with” for “Such objection shall be in writing, signed by the objecting party or counsel of record for the objecting party and shall be filed with” in the third sentence of subsection C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200, in subsection B, substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” in the first sentence and “the Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” in the third sentence.

§ 63.2-1223.
Revocation of entrustment agreement.

A valid entrustment agreement terminating all parental rights and responsibilities to the child shall be revocable by either of the birth parents until (i) the child has reached the age of 10 days and (ii) seven days have elapsed from the date of execution of the agreement. In addition, a valid entrustment agreement shall be revocable by either of the birth parents if the child has not been placed in the physical custody of the prospective adoptive parents at the time of such revocation. Revocation of an entrustment agreement shall be in writing and signed by the revoking party. The written revocation shall be delivered to the child-placing agency or local board to which the child was originally entrusted. Delivery of the written revocation shall be made during the business day of the child-placing agency or local board to which the child was originally entrusted, in accordance with the applicable time period set out in this section. If the revocation period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or any day on which the agency or local board is officially closed, the revocation period shall be extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or other day on which the agency or local board is officially closed. Upon revocation of the entrustment agreement, the child shall be returned to the parent revoking the agreement.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.2; 1990, c. 202; 1991, c. 364; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.30; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, cc. 606, 623.

Cross references.

For provision that after expiration of the revocation period, there shall be no presumption in favor of a birth parent with regard to a child who has been placed for adoption, and that upon motion the court shall determine whether the parent’s consent is required and whether such consent is being withheld contrary to the best interests of the child, see §

63.2-1206

.

As to removal of child from adoptive home, see §

63.2-1207

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “10 days” for “twenty-five days” and “seven days” for “fifteen days” and “physical custody” for “home” in the second sentence. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and inserted “the prospective” preceding “adoptive parents” in the second sentence.

§ 63.2-1224.
Explanation of process, legal effects of adoption required.

Prior to the placement of a child for adoption, the licensed child-placing agency or local board having custody of the child shall provide an explanation of the adoption process to the birth mother and, if reasonably available, the man who is an acknowledged father pursuant to §

20-49.1

, an adjudicated father pursuant to §

20-49.8

, a presumed father pursuant to §

63.2-1202

, or a putative father who has registered with the Virginia Birth Father Registry pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.2; 1990, c. 202; 1991, c. 364; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.31; 2002, c. 747; 2010, c. 855; 2017, c. 200.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 855 substituted the language beginning “shall provide an explanation of the adoption process to the birth mother” through to the end for “shall counsel the birth mother or if reasonably available, both birth parents, concerning the disposition of their child.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry.”

§ 63.2-1225.
Determination of appropriate home.

In determining the appropriate home in which to place a child for adoption, a married couple or an unmarried individual shall be eligible to receive placement of a child for purposes of adoption. Prior to or after the acceptance of custody of a child placed for adoption, a licensed child-placing agency or a local board shall consider the recommendations of the birth parent(s), a physician or attorney licensed in the Commonwealth, or a clergyman who is familiar with the situation of the prospective adoptive parent(s) or the child. No birth parent, physician, attorney or clergyman shall advertise that he is available to make recommendations, nor shall he charge any fee for such recommendations to a board or agency, except that an attorney may charge for legal fees and services rendered in connection with such placement.

The agency or local board may give consideration to placement of the child with the recommended adoptive parent(s) if the agency or local board finds that such placement is in the best interest of the child. When the birth parent(s) has recommended such placement, the agency or local board shall provide the birth parent(s) the opportunity to be represented by independent legal counsel as well as the opportunity for counseling with a social worker, family-services specialist, or other qualified equivalent worker. The agency or board also shall advise the prospective adoptive parent(s) of the right to be represented by independent legal counsel. The parties may, but are not required to, exchange identifying information as provided for in subdivision A 3 of §

63.2-1232

.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.2; 1990, c. 202; 1991, c. 364; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.32; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 779; 2006, cc. 654, 825; 2009, c. 805; 2014, c. 285.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 779 added the second sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 654 and 825 are identical, and rewrote the section. Acts 2006, c. 654 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825 is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805, in subsection A, substituted “Prior to or after the acceptance of custody of a child placed for adoption” for “When” and deleted “accepts custody of the child for purposes of placing the child for adoption, the agency or local board” preceding “shall consider the.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 285, effective March 24, 2014, in subsection B inserted “family-services specialist, or other qualified equivalent worker” at the end of the second sentence.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 63.2-1226.
When birth parents recommend adoptive parents.

When a licensed child-placing agency or a local board is requested to accept custody of a child for the purpose of placing the child with adoptive parent(s) recommended by the birth parent(s) or a person other than a licensed child-placing agency or local board, either the parental placement adoption provisions or the agency adoption provisions of this chapter shall apply to such placement at the election of the birth parent(s). Such agency or local board shall provide information to the birth parent(s) regarding the parental placement adoption and agency adoption provisions and shall provide the birth parent the opportunity to be represented by independent legal counsel as well as counseling with a social worker, family-services specialist, or other qualified equivalent worker. No person shall charge, pay, give, or agree to give or accept any money, property, services, or other thing of value in connection with such adoption except as provided in §

63.2-1218

.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.2; 1990, c. 202; 1991, c. 364; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.33; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 654, 825; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2014, c. 285.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 654 and 825 are identical, and rewrote the section. Acts 2006, c. 654, is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and substituted “accept” for “and accepts” preceding “custody” near the beginning of the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 285, effective March 24, 2014, inserted “family-services specialist, or other qualified equivalent worker” at the end of the second sentence.

§ 63.2-1227.
Filing of petition for agency adoption.

A petition for the adoption of a child placed in the physical custody of the petitioners by a child-placing agency shall be filed in the name by which the child will be known after adoption, provided the name is followed by the registration number of the child’s original birth certificate and the state or country in which the registration occurred unless it is verified by the registrar of vital statistics of the state or country of birth that such information is not available. In the case of a child born in another country, an affidavit by a representative of the child-placing agency that a birth certificate number is not available may be substituted for verification by a registrar of vital statistics for that country. The report of investigation required by §

63.2-1208

and, when applicable, the report required by §

63.2-1212

shall be identified with the child’s name as it appears on the birth certificate, the birth registration number and the name by which the child is to be known after the final order of adoption is entered. The petition for adoption shall not state the birth name of the child or identify the birth parents unless it is specifically stated in the agency’s consent that the parties have exchanged identifying information.

A single petition for adoption under the provisions of this section shall be sufficient for the concurrent adoption by the same petitioners of two or more children who have the same birth parent or parents, and nothing in this section shall be construed as having heretofore required a separate petition for each of such children.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-348; 1952, c. 550; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 300; 1964, c. 459; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-221; 1970, c. 672; 1973, c. 406; 1975, c. 461; 1978, c. 730; 1983, c. 614; 1988, c. 882; 1989, c. 647; 1991, cc. 76, 602; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.34; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “physical custody” for “home” in the first sentence, inserted the second sentence and added the last sentence. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

§ 63.2-1228.
Forwarding of petition.

Upon the filing of the petition, the circuit court shall, upon being satisfied as to proper jurisdiction and venue, immediately enter an interlocutory order or an order referring the case to a child-placing agency to conduct an investigation and prepare a report pursuant to §

63.2-1208

. Upon entry of the interlocutory order or the order of reference, the court shall forward a copy of the petition and all exhibits thereto to the Commissioner and to the agency that placed the child. In cases where the child was placed by an agency in another state, or by an agency, court, or other entity in another country, the petition and all exhibits shall be forwarded to the local director or licensed child-placing agency, whichever agency completed the home study or provided supervision. If no Virginia agency provided such services, or such agency is no longer licensed or has gone out of business, the petition and all exhibits shall be forwarded to the local director of the locality where the petitioners reside or resided at the time of filing the petition or had legal residence at the time of the filing of the petition.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-349; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 489; 1956, c. 187; 1962, c. 603; 1964, c. 429; 1968, cc. 346, 578, § 63.1-223; 1974, cc. 26, 493, 507; 1975, c. 364; 1978, c. 730; 1980, c. 740; 1982, c. 115; 1988, cc. 579, 599, 882; 1989, c. 647; 1992, c. 607; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.35; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2022, c. 377.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and divided the former first sentence into the first and second sentences by adding “Upon entry of the order of reference, the court shall” preceding “forward a copy” and added the language beginning “upon being satisfied” to the end of the first sentence and inserted “or such agency is no longer licensed or has gone out of business” in the last sentence. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 377 inserted “interlocutory order or an” and a variant.

§§ 63.2-1228.1,
63.2-1228.2.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 331, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

63.2-1228.1

and 63.2-1228.2, relating to post-adoption contact and communication agreements, and jurisdiction to approve such agreements, were enacted by Acts 2009, cc. 98 and 260.

§ 63.2-1229.
Foster parent adoption.

When a foster parent who has a child placed in the foster parents’ home by a licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency desires to adopt the child and (i) the child-placing agency holding custody of the child consents to the adoption after the child has resided in the home of such foster parent continuously for at least six months or the child-placing agency holding custody of the child does not consent to the adoption and the child has resided in the home of such foster parent continuously for at least 18 months and (ii) the birth parents’ rights to the child have been terminated, the circuit court shall accept the petition filed by the foster parent and shall order a thorough investigation of the matter to be made pursuant to §

63.2-1208

. The circuit court may refer the matter for investigation to a licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency other than the agency holding custody of the child. Upon completion of the investigation and report and filing of the consent of the agency holding custody of the child, or upon the finding contemplated by §

63.2-1205

, the circuit court may enter a final order of adoption waiving visitation requirements, if the circuit court determines that the adoption is in the best interests of the child.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-348; 1952, c. 550; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 300; 1964, c. 459; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-221; 1970, c. 672; 1973, c. 406; 1975, c. 461; 1978, c. 730; 1983, c. 614; 1988, c. 882; 1989, c. 647; 1991, cc. 76, 602; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.36; 2002, c. 747; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2018, c. 94.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and substituted “§

63.2-1205

” for “subsection D of §

63.2-1202

” near the end of the section.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 94, effective March 2, 2018, inserted “child-placing agency holding custody of the child consents to the adoption after the child has resided in the home of such foster parent continuously for at least six months or the child-placing agency holding custody of the child does not consent to the adoption and the” in clause (i) and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).